Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1936.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-101, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 182, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 3-101), is amended to read as follows:
Section 3-101. A. The State Board of Education shall consist
of seven (7) eleven (11) members. The State Superintendent of

Req. No. 12372 Page 1

Publ ic Instruction shall be a member and the chairperson of the
Board. The remaining six ten members shall be appointed as follows:
1. Six members appointed by the Governor by and with the advice
and consent of the Senate. Except as otherwise provided for in
subsection B of this section, upon assuming office each Governor
shall appoint one member from each congressional district and one
member from the state at large;
2. Two members appointed by the Speaker of the Oklahoma House
of Representatives, one which shall be a rural resident of the state
and one which shall be a former school superintendent from a
district with an enrollment of less than ten thousand (10,000)
students; and
3. Two members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Oklahoma State Senate, one which shall be a rural resident of the
state and one which shall be a former school superintendent from a
district with an enrollment of more than ten thousand (10,000)
students.
Each appointment shall be made to take effect on April 2. The term
of each appointed member shall be four (4) years. Appointed members
shall serve until a successor is appointed. Appointed members shall
serve at the pleasure of the Governor their appointing authority.
Upon the occurrence of a vacancy the same shall be filled by the
Governor appointing authority for that vacancy, subject to
confirmation by the Senate at the next session of the Legislature if
Req. No. 12372 Page 2

the vacancy is a member appointed by the Governor. The appointment
to fill a vacancy shall be made for the unexpired term.
B. On the effective date of this act January 25, 2027, all
appointed positions of the current State Board of Education shall be
deemed vacant and the terms of persons serving on the Board shall be
deemed terminated. The Governor appointing authority shall make
initial appointments pursuant to the provisions of this subsection
within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this act, with one
member appointed from each congressional district and one member
appointed from the state at large January 25, 2027. The
appointments Members appointed by the Governor shall be subject to
confirmation by the Senate at the next session of the Legislature.
The terms for members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall
terminate on April 2, 2015 2031. Thereafter, members shall be
appointed as provided for in subsection A of this section.
C. No person shall be eligible to be appointed to serve on the
Board unless the person has been awarded a high school diploma or
certificate of high school equivalency. No person shall be
appointed to serve on the Board if the person serves on a board of
education of a school district which is supervised by the Board
pursuant to Section 3-104 of this title. Any member appointed to
the Board shall complete the workshop requirements of a new school
board member pursuant to Section 5-110 of this title within thirteen
(13) months following or preceding the appointment of the member.
Req. No. 12372 Page 3

Notw ithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State
Department of Education shall not charge any member of the State
Board of Education a fee for any workshop provided by the Department
for board members pursuant to Section 5-110 of this title and shall
not pay a fee to any organization or institution of higher education
on behalf of a member of the State Board of Education, or reimburse
any member of the Board for a fee paid to any organization or
institution of higher education, for attendance at a workshop or
courses to satisfy the requirements of Section 5-110 of this title.
D. Members of the Board shall receive necessary traveling
travel expenses while in the performance of their duties in
accordance with the State Travel Reimbursement Act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-1-12372 AQH 02/04/25









Req. No. 12372 Page 4